Georgia, session 2025_26, HB753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Better Georgia Without Blight Act."
SECTION 2.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The existence of real property that is maintained in a blighted condition increases
burdens on state and local governments by increasing the need for government services,
H. B. 753
- 1 -

LC 52 0740
including but not limited to social services, public safety services, and code enforcement
services;
(2) Notwithstanding current methods of addressing blighted properties, there is a need
for the state to provide financing and technical assistance to help local, municipal, county,
or consolidated governments throughout this state to take on the formidable task of
encouraging the rehabilitation of blighted properties or the actual rehabilitation of such
properties;
(3) The rehabilitation of blighted properties decreases the need for state and local
government services, which saves resources;
(4) The rehabilitation of blighted properties improves communities by making them safer
and more attractive places in which to live, work, and play, and the improvement of
communities leads to better residents, better employees, and better customers; and
(5) Improved communities will strengthen Georgia's status as number one for business
and number one for homes.
SECTION 3.
Chapter 8 of Title 50 the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the Department of
Community Affairs, is amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
"ARTICLE 14
50-8-400.
As used in this article, the term:
(1) 'Better Georgia Without Blight Fund' or 'fund' means the assistance program
established pursuant to this article.
(2) 'Blighted property' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 22-1-1.
(3) 'Commissioner' means the commissioner of community affairs.
H. B. 753
- 2 -

LC 52 0740
(4) 'Department' means the Department of Community Affairs.
50-8-401.
(a) The Better Georgia Without Blight Fund is established within the department for the
purpose of assisting local, municipal, county, or consolidated governments with financing,
including loans, loan guarantees, and matching grants, and technical assistance to
encourage the rehabilitation of blighted properties.
(b) The commissioner shall serve as the director of the fund.
(c) The department shall be authorized to apply for, receive, administer, and use any grant,
other financial assistance, or other funds made available to the department from any
government or other source for furthering the purposes of the fund.
50-8-402.
(a) The department shall establish criteria and standards for eligible applicants and eligible
blighted properties.
(b) The department shall establish criteria, implement an application process, and provide
financing and technical assistance consistent with the provisions of this article. Such
criteria shall include documentation of:
(1) A public inspection of the parcel of property and an official identification of such
property as blighted property;
(2) Written notice of the identification of the parcel of property as blighted property to
the property owner;
(3) At least one stakeholder meeting allowing for response from the property owner and
the community;
(4) Revenue loss from blighted property's condition;
(5) Local commitment to the rehabilitation of the property; and
H. B. 753
- 3 -

LC 52 0740
(6) Any other requirements that the department determines as necessary for the
successful rehabilitation of a blighted property.
50-8-403.
The department shall be authorized to promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to
implement and administer this article.
50-8-404.
Beginning July 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the commissioner shall submit a detailed
report to the Governor and notify members of the General Assembly of the availability of
such report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient. The annual
report shall contain the department's findings and recommendations regarding the
implementation of this article. Such annual reports shall be published on the department's
internet website and shall be made publicly available.
50-8-405.
This article shall be automatically repealed on June 30, 2031, unless continued in effect by
the General Assembly prior to such date."
SECTION 4.
(a) This Act shall become effective only if funds are specifically appropriated for the
purposes of this Act in an appropriations Act enacted by the General Assembly.
(b) If funds are so appropriated, then this Act shall become effective on the later of:
(1) The date on which such appropriations Act becomes effective; or
(2) The beginning date of the fiscal year for which such appropriations are made.
H. B. 753
- 4 -

LC 52 0740
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 753
- 5 -